Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Powers and Duties of Board

6-20-201. Election of mayor — Absence or disability of mayor.

The commissioners, at the first regular meeting after each biennial election, shall elect one (1) of their number mayor for a term of two (2) years, and, thus organized, the body shall be known as the board of commissioners.

In cities holding elections every four (4) years under the terms of § 6-20-101(e), the commissioners, at the first regular meeting after the quadrennial election and every two (2) years subsequent thereto, shall elect one (1) of their number mayor for a term of two (2) years, and the body so organized shall be known as the board of commissioners. This subdivision (a)(2) shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any municipality to which it may apply.

Cities holding elections every four (4) years under the terms of § 6-20-101 and having a population of not less than one thousand twenty (1,020) nor more than one thousand thirty (1,030), according to a 1987 state certified census or any subsequent federal census, shall have the option of a popular election of a mayor, to serve four (4) consecutive years, as the board of commissioners directs the county election commission to hold under § 6-20-102. Voters shall be entitled to vote for a mayor and two (2) or four (4) commissioners dependent upon those provisions of § 6-20-101 in effect for that city.

Subdivision (a)(3)(A) shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any municipality to which it may apply.

Rather than being elected by the board of commissioners, the mayor may be elected by popular vote if this method of electing the mayor is approved in a referendum in the city. In the referendum, the question on the ballot shall appear in substantially this form:

Shall the mayor of this city be elected by popular vote rather than by the board of commissioners?

The referendum may be called by resolution of the board of commissioners or by petition of ten percent (10%) of the registered voters of the city. The referendum shall be held by the county election commission as provided in the general election law for elections on questions, or the resolution or petition may provide that the referendum be held at the next regular city election.

Once the popular election of the mayor has been approved by a majority of those voting, the board of commissioners shall designate by ordinance one (1) of the commissioner positions as that of mayor. The popular election of the mayor shall take effect at the next election for the position designated. In the mayoral election, the person receiving the most votes shall become the mayor. The term of the popularly elected mayor shall be four (4) years.

In a city that has chosen to elect commissioners from districts and that also has chosen to elect the mayor by popular vote, the board of commissioners shall establish one (1) less district than the number of commissioners, and the mayor shall be elected at-large for a four-year term.

The popularly elected mayor shall have the same powers and duties as a mayor chosen by the board of commissioners.

During the absence or disability of the mayor, the board shall designate some properly qualified person to perform the mayor's duties.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 1; art. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., §§ 1997a133, 1997a157; Code 1932, §§ 3530, 3554; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2012; Acts 1983, ch. 14, § 2; 1989, ch. 61, § 1; 1989, ch. 175, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 61, § 3, provided that for the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of subdivision (a)(3), that act took effect April 3, 1989; and for all other purposes shall take effect upon being approved as provided in subdivision (a)(3).

Cross-References. Appointment of vice mayor, § 6-20-202.

Duties of vice mayor, § 6-20-203.

Mayor, minimum compensation in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 7-51-301.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-20-202. Appointment of vice mayor.

At the first meeting of the board, and thereafter at the first meeting after a general city election, the board shall choose from its membership a member to act in the absence, inability, or failure to act of the mayor.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 1997a143; Code 1932, § 3540; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2013.

Cross-References. Absence or disability of mayor, § 6-20-201.

6-20-203. Duties of vice mayor.

The vice mayor shall act as mayor during any temporary absence, inability, or failure to act of the mayor, and whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor, such member shall become mayor and hold office as such for the unexpired term.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 1997a144; Code 1932, § 3541; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2014.

Cross-References. Absence or disability of mayor, § 6-20-201.

6-20-204. Compensation of mayor and commissioners.

The salary of the mayor shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300) per month, and the salary of each commissioner shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month; except that in cities that have a population of not less than one thousand (1,000), according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, the salary of the mayor shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month, and the salary of each commissioner shall not exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per month. No increase in the salaries permitted by this section shall become effective unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners.

The salary of the mayor and commissioners shall be set by the board of commissioners. In cities with a population of less than one thousand (1,000), however, the salary of the mayor shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month, and the salary of each commissioner shall not exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per month. In cities with a population of one thousand (1,000) or more, the salary of the mayor shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month, and the salary of each commissioner shall not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) per month. No increase in salaries of the mayor and commissioners shall be effective unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the members to which the board of commissioners is entitled. Populations referred to in this section shall be as determined by the latest federal decennial census.

This subsection (b) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than four hundred seventy thousand (470,000) nor more than four hundred eighty thousand (480,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Notwithstanding the limits established in subsections (a) and (b), the salaries of the mayor and commissioners may be established annually by the board of commissioners at the time of adoption of the annual operating budget; provided, however, that such salaries shall not be increased or diminished prior to the end of the term for which such officials were elected.

This subsection (c) shall become effective upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a136; mod. Code 1932, § 3533; Acts 1968, ch. 541, § 1; 1977, ch. 238, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2015; Acts 1989, ch. 579, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 141, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Councilmen, minimum salaries in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 7-51-302.

Chief elected executive, minimum compensation in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 7-51-301.

Attorney General Opinions. No criminal offense is committed under this section when the board of commissioners increases the salaries of commissioners prior to the end of the term for which the commissioners were elected, but a violation of the terms of subsection (c)(1), if made effective by a two-thirds vote of the board of commissioners, may constitute an offense under T.C.A. § 39-16-402(a)(4), (5), OAG 03-138, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 154 (10/15/03).

6-20-205. Powers of board.

The legislative and all other powers, except as otherwise provided by this charter, are delegated to and vested in the board of commissioners. The board may by ordinance or resolution not inconsistent with this charter prescribe the manner in which any powers of the city shall be exercised, provide all means necessary or proper therefor, and do all things needful within or without the city or state to protect the rights of the city.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a137; Code 1932, § 3534; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2016; Acts 1986, ch. 765, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 1072, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted former (b) which read: “(b)(1) Any member of a local governing body of a county or a municipality who is also an employee of such county or municipality may vote on matters in which such member has a conflict of interest if the member informs the governing body immediately prior to the vote as follows:“‘Because I am an employee of (name of governmental unit), I have a conflict of interest in the proposal about to be voted. However, I declare that my argument and my vote answer only to my conscience and to my obligation to my constituents and the citizens this body represents.’“(2) In the event a member of a local governing body of a county or a municipality has a conflict of interest in a matter to be voted upon by the body, the member may abstain for cause by announcing such to the presiding officer. Any member of a local governing body of a county or municipality, who abstains from voting for cause on any issue coming to a vote before the body shall not be counted for the purpose of determining a majority vote.“(3) The vote of any person having a conflict of interest who does not inform the governing body of such conflict as provided in subdivision (b)(1) shall be void if challenged in a timely manner. As used in this subdivision (b)(3), ‘timely manner’ means during the same meeting at which the vote was cast and prior to the transaction of any further business by the body.“(4) Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed as altering, amending or otherwise affecting § 12-4-101(a). In the event of any conflict between this subsection (b) and § 12-4-101(a), § 12-4-101(a) shall prevail.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1072, § 6. May 20, 2016.

6-20-206. Exercise of board's powers.

The board shall exercise its powers in session duly assembled, and no member or group of members thereof shall exercise or attempt to exercise the powers conferred upon the board, except through proceedings adopted at some regular or special session.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a138; Code 1932, § 3535; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2017.

6-20-207. Regular meetings.

The board of commissioners shall by ordinance fix the time and place at which the regular meetings of the board shall be held. Until otherwise provided by ordinance, the regular meetings of the board shall be held at eight o'clock p.m. (8:00 p.m.) on the first and third Thursdays of each month.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1997a139; Code 1932, § 3536; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2018.

6-20-208. Special meetings.

Whenever, in the opinion of the mayor, city manager or any two (2) commissioners the welfare of the city demands it, the mayor or the recorder shall call special meetings of the board of commissioners upon at least twelve (12) hours written notice to each commissioner, the city manager, recorder, and city attorney, served personally or left at such person's usual place of residence. Each call for a special meeting shall set forth the character of the business to be discussed at such meeting and no other business shall be considered at such meeting.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1997a140; Code 1932, § 3537; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2019.

6-20-209. Mayor presiding.

The mayor shall preside at all meetings of the board of commissioners.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 1997a141; Code 1932, § 3538; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2020.

Cross-References. Absence or disability of mayor, §§ 6-20-201, 6-20-202.

Mayor presiding, § 6-20-213.

6-20-210. Quorum.

A majority of all the members of the board constitutes a quorum, but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may compel the attendance of the absentees in such manner and under such penalties as the board may provide.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 1997a145; Code 1932, § 3542; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2021.

Collateral References.

Abstention from voting of member of municipal council present at session as affecting voting majority. 63 A.L.R.3d 1072.

6-20-211. Procedural powers and duties of board — Penalties.

The board may determine the rules of its proceedings, subject to this charter, and may arrest and punish by fine any member or other person guilty of disorderly or contemptuous behavior in its presence.

The board has the power and may delegate it to any committee to:

Subpoena witnesses, and order the production of books and papers relating to any subject within its jurisdiction;

Call upon its own officers or the chief of police to execute its process; and

Arrest and punish by fine or imprisonment, or both, any person refusing to obey such subpoena or order.

The refusal to obey a subpoena or order of the board is a Class C misdemeanor.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor, and each day's continuance in any refusal to comply with the requirements of this section is a separate offense.

The board's presiding officer or the chair of any committee may administer oaths to witnesses.

The board shall keep a journal of its proceedings, and the yeas and nays on all questions shall be entered thereon.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 1997a146; Code 1932, § 3543; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2022; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 8; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

6-20-212. Board sessions public. — Emergencies.

All sessions of the board shall be public.

All sessions of the board shall be subject to a change of plan in case of emergency.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 1997a147; Code 1932, § 3544; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2023.

6-20-213. Powers of mayor.

The mayor shall preside at all meetings of the board of commissioners and perform such other duties consistent with the mayor's office as may be imposed by it, and the mayor shall have a seat, a voice and a vote, but no veto. The mayor shall sign the journal of the board and all ordinances on their final passage, execute all deeds, bonds, and contracts made in the name of the city, and the mayor may introduce ordinances to the board of commissioners.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 6, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a154; Code 1932, § 3551; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2024.

Cross-References. Mayor presiding, § 6-20-209.

6-20-214. Style of ordinances.

All ordinances shall begin, “Be it ordained by the city of (here insert name) as follows:”.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 5, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a149; Code 1932, § 3546; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2025.

6-20-215. Ordinance procedure.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2), every ordinance shall be read two (2) different days in open session before its adoption, and not less than one (1) week shall elapse between first and second readings, and any ordinance not so read shall be null and void. Any city incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title may establish by ordinance a procedure to read only the caption of an ordinance, instead of the entire ordinance, on both readings. Copies of such ordinances shall be available during regular business hours at the office of the city recorder and during sessions in which the ordinance has its second reading.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the board of commissioners governing any city incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title may adopt ordinances pursuant to a consent calendar if the board unanimously passes an ordinance approving the consent calendar; provided, the ordinance approving the consent calendar shall require that:

Each ordinance on the consent calendar be considered on two (2) different days in open session before its adoption and that not less than one (1) week shall elapse between first and second consideration;

Copies of each ordinance adopted pursuant to the consent calendar be available during regular business hours at the office of the city recorder and during sessions in which the ordinance has its second reading;

If any board member objects to an ordinance on the consent calendar or any amendment is adopted to an ordinance on the consent calendar, then the ordinance shall be removed from the consent calendar and may be adopted pursuant to subdivision (a)(1); and

Copies of the consent calendar shall be published along with the agenda prior to any meeting at which the consent calendar will be considered.

A city that has established a consent calendar pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) may eliminate the consent calendar by passage of an ordinance in the same manner required to create the consent calendar.

An ordinance shall not take effect until fifteen (15) days after the first passage thereof, except in case of an emergency ordinance. An emergency ordinance may become effective upon the day of its final passage; provided, that it shall contain the statement that an emergency exists and shall specify the distinct facts and reasons constituting such an emergency.

The unanimous vote of all members of the board present shall be required to pass an emergency ordinance.

No ordinance making a grant, renewal, or extension of a franchise or other special privilege, or regulating the rate to be charged for its service by any public utility shall ever be passed as an emergency ordinance. No ordinance shall be amended, except by a new ordinance.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 5, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a150; Code 1932, § 3547; Acts 1976, ch. 420, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2026; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 9; 1995, ch. 13, § 10; 1996, ch. 652, § 4; 2015, ch. 115, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2),” to the beginning of the first sentence of (a)(1) and added (a)(2) and (3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 115, § 2. April 10, 2015.

6-20-216. Voting by board.

In all cases under § 6-20-215, the vote shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the members voting for or against an ordinance shall be entered upon the journal.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 5, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a151; Code 1932, § 3548; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2027.

6-20-217. Recording of ordinances.

Every ordinance shall be immediately taken charge of by the recorder and by the recorder be numbered, copied in an ordinance book, filed and preserved in the recorder's office.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 5, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a152; Code 1932, § 3549; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2028.

6-20-218. Publication of penal ordinances — Effective date.

Each ordinance of a penal nature, or the caption of each ordinance of a penal nature, shall be published after its final passage in a newspaper of general circulation in the city.

No such ordinance shall take effect until the ordinance, or its caption, is published, except as otherwise provided in chapter 54, part 5 of this title.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 5, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a153; Code 1932, § 3550; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2029; Acts 1981, ch. 194, § 1; 1984, ch. 811, § 2; 1989, ch. 175, § 16.

Cross-References. Publication of ordinances, § 6-2-102.

6-20-219. Mayoral duties required by ordinance.

The mayor has the power and it is hereby made the mayor's duty to perform all acts that may be required of the mayor by any ordinance duly enacted by the board of commissioners, not in conflict with any of the provisions of this charter.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 6, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a155; Code 1932, § 3552; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2030.

6-20-220. Removal of officers.

The mayor or any commissioner may be removed from office by the board of commissioners for crime or misdemeanor in office, for grave misconduct showing unfitness for public duty, or for permanent disability, by a majority vote of the other members of the board voting for such removal. The proceedings for such removal shall be upon specific charges in writing, which, with a notice stating the time and place of the hearing, shall be served on the accused or published at least three (3) times on three (3) successive days in a daily newspaper circulating in the city.

The hearing shall be public and the accused shall have the right to appear and defend in person or by counsel and have process of the board to compel the attendance of witnesses in the accused's behalf. Such vote shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the members voting for or against such removal shall be entered in the journal.

Immediately upon the vote for removal, the term of the accused shall expire and the accused's official status, power and authority shall cease without further action.

Anyone removed under this section shall have the right of appeal.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 4, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 1997a148; Code 1932, § 3545; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2032; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 10.